Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5171.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "household water lien prohibition act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Local government unit" means a county, township, city, or village. (b) "Water authority" means an entity, including, but not limited to, a local government unit, corporation, authority, or utility, that provides water, sewage, or stormwater management services and establishes rates and charges fees for the provision of those services. Sec. 3. (1) A water authority shall not place or acquire a lien on a residential property in connection with the provision of water, sewage, or stormwater management services. (2) A lien on residential property in connection with the provision of water, sewage, or stormwater management services in existence before the effective date of this act, including a lien created under former 1939 PA 178, is dissolved. Enacting section 1. 1939 PA 178, MCL 123.161 to 123.167, is repealed.